Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.0355

Commission—Qualifications of members.

Members must be residents of this state. Dentist members must be licensed dentists in the active practice of dentistry for a period of five years before appointment. Of the twelve dentists appointed to the commission, at least four must reside and engage in the active practice of dentistry east of the summit of the Cascade mountain range. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

[ 2022 c 240 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 206.]